District of Columbia statutes.
47-3921

Applicability.

The provisions of [D.C. Law 8-4 or 8-26] § 22 [codified in § 47-2501] shall apply as of July 1, 1986. All other sections of this act shall apply as of March 1, 1989.

History

Sept. 20, 1989, D.C. Law 8-26, § 25, 36 DCR 4723
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-3921.

References in Text

“Section 22” is § 22 of D.C. Law 8-26, which is codified at § 47-2501.

“This act,” referred to in this section, is D.C. Law 8-26, which is primarily codified as § 47-3901 et seq.